Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2460
Administration, defined.

Administration means the act of (1) administering, (2) keeping a record of such activity, and (3) observing, monitoring, reporting, and otherwise taking appropriate action regarding desired effect, side effect, interaction, and contraindication associated with administering the drug or device.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 4.